District of Columbia statutes.
47-392.07

Recommendations on financial stability and management responsibility.

(a)

In general. —

The Authority may at any time submit recommendations to the Mayor, the Council, the President, and Congress on actions the District government or the Federal Government may take to ensure compliance by the District government with a financial plan and budget or to otherwise promote the financial stability, management responsibility, and service delivery efficiency of the District government, including recommendations relating to:

(1)

The management of the District government’s financial affairs, including cash forecasting, information technology, placing controls on expenditures for personnel, reducing benefit costs, reforming procurement practices, and placing other controls on expenditures;

(2)

The relationship between the District government and the Federal Government;

(3)

The structural relationship of departments, agencies, and independent agencies within the District government;

(4)

The modification of existing revenue structures, or the establishment of additional revenue structures;

(5)

The establishment of alternatives for meeting obligations to pay for the pensions of former District government employees;

(6)

Modifications or transfers of the types of services which are the responsibility of and are delivered by the District government;

(7)

Modifications of the types of services which are delivered by entities other than the District government under alternative service delivery mechanisms (including privatization and commercialization);

(8)

The effects of District of Columbia laws and court orders on the operations of the District government;

(9)

The establishment of a personnel system for employees of the District government which is based upon employee performance standards; and

(10)

The improvement of personnel training and proficiency, the adjustment of staffing levels, and the improvement of training and performance of management and supervisory personnel.

(b)

Response to recommendations for actions within authority of District government. —

(1)

In general. —

In the case of any recommendations submitted under subsection (a) of this section during a control year which are within the Authority of the District government to adopt, not later than 90 days after receiving the recommendations, the Mayor or the Council (whichever has the Authority to adopt the recommendation) shall submit a statement to the Authority, the President, and Congress which provides notice as to whether the District government will adopt the recommendations.

(2)

Implementation plan required for adopted recommendations. —

If the Mayor or the Council (whichever is applicable) notifies the Authority and Congress under paragraph (1) of this subsection that the District government will adopt any of the recommendations submitted under subsection (a) of this section, the Mayor or the Council (whichever is applicable) shall include in the statement a written plan to implement the recommendation which includes:

(A)

Specific performance measures to determine the extent to which the District government has adopted the recommendation; and

(B)

A schedule for auditing the District government’s compliance with the plan.

(3)

Explanations required for recommendations not adopted. —

If the Mayor or the Council (whichever is applicable) notifies the Authority, the President, and Congress under paragraph (1) of this subsection that the District government will not adopt any recommendation submitted under subsection (a) of this section which the District government has authority to adopt, the Mayor or the Council shall include in the statement explanations for the rejection of the recommendations.

(c)

Implementation of rejected recommendations by Authority. —

(1)

In general. —

If the Mayor or the Council (whichever is applicable) notifies the Authority, the President, and Congress under subsection (b)(1) of this section that the District government will not adopt any recommendation submitted under subsection (a) of this section which the District government has authority to adopt, the Authority may by a majority vote of its members take such action concerning the recommendation as it deems appropriate, after consulting with the Committee on Government Reform and Oversight of the House of Representatives and the Committee on Governmental Affairs of the Senate.

(2)

Effective date. —

This subsection shall apply with respect to recommendations of the Authority made after the expiration of the 6-month period which begins April 17, 1995.

(d)

Additional power to issue orders, rules, and regulations. —

(1)

In general. —

In addition to the authority described in subsection (c) of this section, the Authority may at any time issue such orders, rules, or regulations as it considers appropriate to carry out the purposes of this Act and the amendments made by this Act, to the extent that the issuance of such an order, rule, or regulation is within the authority of the Mayor or the head of any department or agency of the District government, and any such order, rule, or regulation shall be legally binding to the same extent as if issued by the Mayor or the head of any such department or agency.

(2)

Notification. —

Upon issuing an order, rule, or regulation pursuant to this subsection, the Authority shall notify the Mayor, the Council, the President, and Congress.

(3)

No judicial review of decision to issue order. —

The decision by the Authority to issue an order, rule, or regulation pursuant to this subsection shall be final and shall not be subject to judicial review.

History

Apr. 17, 1995, 109 Stat. 133, Pub. L. 104-8, § 207
Sept. 30, 1996, 110 Stat. 3009 1457, Pub. L. 104-208, § 5203(f)
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-391.01 and § 47-395.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-392.7.

References in Text

“This Act,” referred to in subsection (d)(1), is the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Act of 1995, approved April 17, 1995, 109 Stat. 97, Pub. L. 104-8.

Editor's Notes

Council Response to the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Authority Regulatory Reform Section 207 Recommendations Emergency Resolution of 1998: Pursuant to Resolution 12-673, effective August 24, 1998, the Council responded, on an emergency basis, to the regulatory reform section 207 recommendations made by the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Authority.